Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2004
Personal jurisdiction.

Any act of transacting an insurance business as set forth in section 44-2002 by any unauthorized insurer shall constitute sufficient contact with this state for the exercise of personal jurisdiction over such insurer in any action, suit, or proceeding in any court by the Director of Insurance or by the state or in any proceeding before the director and which arises out of transacting an insurance business in this state by such insurer.

Laws 1969, c. 351, § 4, p. 1226;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 65.